California statutes. Penal Code
(a) At the time of sentencing or pronouncement of judgment in which sentencing is imposed, the court shall make an oral statement that statutory law permits the award of conduct and worktime credits up to one-third or one-half of the sentence that is imposed by the court, that the award and calculation of credits is determined by the sheriff in cases involving imprisonment in county jails and by the Department of Corrections in cases involving imprisonment in the state prison, and that credit for presentence incarceration served by the defendant is calculated by the probation department under current state law.

As used in this section, “victim” means the victim of the offense, the victim’s parent or guardian if the victim is a minor, or the victim’s next of kin.

(b) The probation officer shall provide a general estimate of the credits to which the defendant may be entitled for previous time served, and conduct or worktime credits authorized under Sections 2931, 2933, or 4019, and shall inform the victim pursuant to Section 1191.1. The probation officer shall file this estimate with the court and it shall become a part of the court record.

(c) This section applies to all felony convictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1247, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.

Upon a plea of guilty, or upon conviction by the court without a jury, of a crime or attempted crime distinguished or divided into degrees, the court must, before passing sentence, determine the degree. Upon the failure of the court to so determine, the degree of the crime or attempted crime of which the defendant is guilty, shall be deemed to be of the lesser degree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1166.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.1.

Upon a plea of guilty to an information or indictment accusing the defendant of a crime or attempted crime divided into degrees when consented to by the prosecuting attorney in open court and approved by the court, such plea may specify the degree thereof and in such event the defendant cannot be punished for a higher degree of the crime or attempted crime than the degree specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1166.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.2.

Upon a plea of guilty before a committing magistrate as provided in Section 859a, to a crime or attempted crime divided into degrees, when consented to by the prosecuting attorney in open court and approved by such magistrate, such plea may specify the degree thereof and in such event, the defendant cannot be punished for a higher degree of the crime or attempted crime than the degree specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1166.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.3.

(a) A plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an accusatory pleading charging a public offense, other than a felony specified in Section 1192.5 or 1192.7, which public offense did not result in damage for which restitution may be ordered, made on the condition that charges be dismissed for one or more public offenses arising from the same or related course of conduct by the defendant which did result in damage for which restitution may be ordered, may specify the payment of restitution by the defendant as a condition of the plea or any probation granted pursuant thereto, so long as the plea is freely and voluntarily made, there is factual basis for the plea, and the plea and all conditions are approved by the court.

(b) If restitution is imposed which is attributable to a count dismissed pursuant to a plea bargain, as described in this section, the court shall obtain a waiver pursuant to People v. Harvey (1979) 25 Cal. 3d 754 from the defendant as to the dismissed count.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.4.

If the defendant’s plea of guilty pursuant to Section 1192.1 or 1192.2 is not accepted by the prosecuting attorney and approved by the court, the plea shall be deemed withdrawn and the defendant may then enter such plea or pleas as would otherwise have been available. The plea so withdrawn may not be received in evidence in any criminal, civil, or special action or proceeding of any nature, including proceedings before agencies, commissions, boards, and tribunals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.5.

(a) Upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an accusatory pleading charging a felony, other than a violation of paragraph (2), (3), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, Section 264.1, Section 286 or 287 or former Section 288a by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily harm, subdivision (b) of Section 288, or subdivision (a) of Section 289, the plea may specify the punishment to the same extent as it may be specified by the jury on a plea of not guilty or fixed by the court on a plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or not guilty, and may specify the exercise by the court thereafter of other powers legally available to it.

(b) When the plea is accepted by the prosecuting attorney
 in open court and is approved by the court, the defendant, except as otherwise provided in this section, cannot be sentenced on the plea to a punishment more severe than that specified in the plea and the court may not proceed as to the plea other than as specified in the plea.

(c) If the court approves of the plea, it shall inform the defendant prior to the making of the plea that (1) its approval is not binding, (2) it may, at the time set for the hearing on the application for probation or pronouncement of judgment, withdraw its approval in the light of further consideration of the matter, and (3) in that case, the defendant shall be permitted to withdraw the plea if the defendant desires to do so. The court shall also cause an inquiry to be made of the defendant to satisfy itself that the plea is freely and voluntarily made, and that there is a factual basis for the plea.

(d) If the plea is not accepted by the prosecuting attorney and approved by the court, the plea shall be deemed withdrawn and the defendant may then enter the plea or pleas as would otherwise have been available.

(e) If the plea is withdrawn or deemed withdrawn, it may not be received in evidence in any criminal, civil, or special action or proceeding of any nature, including proceedings before agencies, commissions, boards, and tribunals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 19.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.6.

(a) In each felony case in which the charges contained in the original accusatory pleading are amended or dismissed, the record shall contain a statement explaining the reason for the amendment or dismissal.

(b) In each felony case in which the prosecuting attorney seeks a dismissal of a charge in the complaint, indictment, or information, he or she shall state the specific reasons for the dismissal in open court, on the record.

(c) When, upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an accusatory pleading charging a felony, whether or not that plea is entered pursuant to Section 1192.5, the prosecuting attorney recommends what punishment the court should impose or how it should exercise any of the powers legally available to it, the prosecuting attorney shall state the specific reasons for the recommendation in open court, on the record. The reasons for the recommendation shall be transcribed and made part of the court file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.7.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that district attorneys prosecute violent sex crimes under statutes that provide sentencing under a “one strike,” “three strikes” or habitual sex offender statute instead of engaging in plea bargaining over those offenses.

(2) Plea bargaining in any case in which the indictment or information charges any serious felony, any felony in which it is alleged that a firearm was personally used by the defendant, or any offense of driving while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, or any other intoxicating substance, or any combination thereof, is prohibited, unless there is insufficient evidence to prove the people’s case, or testimony of a material witness cannot be obtained, or a reduction or
 dismissal would not result in a substantial change in sentence.

(3) If the indictment or information charges the defendant with a violent sex crime, as listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.61, that could be prosecuted under Sections 269, 288.7, subdivisions (b) through (i) of Section 667, Section 667.61, or 667.71, plea bargaining is prohibited unless there is insufficient evidence to prove the people’s case, or testimony of a material witness cannot be obtained, or a reduction or dismissal would not result in a substantial change in sentence. At the time of presenting the agreement to the court, the district attorney shall state on the record why a sentence under one of those sections was not sought.

(b) As used in this section, “plea bargaining” means any bargaining, negotiation, or discussion between a criminal defendant, or their counsel, and a prosecuting attorney or
 judge, whereby the defendant agrees to plead guilty or nolo contendere, in exchange for any promises, commitments, concessions, assurances, or consideration by the prosecuting attorney or judge relating to any charge against the defendant or to the sentencing of the defendant.

(c) As used in this section, “serious felony” means any of the following:

(1) Murder or voluntary manslaughter; (2) mayhem; (3) rape; (4) sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, threat of great bodily injury, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person; (5) oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, threat of great bodily injury, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person; (6) lewd or lascivious act on a child under 14 years of age; (7) any felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life; (8) any
 felony in which the defendant personally inflicts great bodily injury on any person, other than an accomplice, or any felony in which the defendant personally uses a firearm; (9) attempted murder; (10) assault with intent to commit rape or robbery; (11) assault with a deadly weapon or instrument on a peace officer; (12) assault by a life prisoner on a noninmate; (13) assault with a deadly weapon by an inmate; (14) arson; (15) exploding a destructive device or any explosive with intent to injure; (16) exploding a destructive device or any explosive causing bodily injury, great bodily injury, or mayhem; (17) exploding a destructive device or any explosive with intent to murder; (18) any burglary of the first degree; (19) robbery or bank robbery; (20) kidnapping; (21) holding of a hostage by a person confined in a state prison; (22) attempt to commit a felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life; (23) any felony in which the defendant personally used a dangerous or deadly weapon;
 (24) selling, furnishing, administering, giving, or offering to sell, furnish, administer, or give to a minor any heroin, cocaine, phencyclidine (PCP), or any methamphetamine-related drug, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 11055 of the Health and Safety Code, or any of the precursors of methamphetamines, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 11055 or subdivision (a) of Section 11100 of the Health and Safety Code; (25) any violation of subdivision (a) of Section 289 where the act is accomplished against the victim’s will by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person; (26) grand theft involving a firearm; (27) carjacking; (28) any felony offense, which would also constitute a felony violation of Section 186.22; (29) assault with the intent to commit mayhem, rape, sodomy, or oral copulation, in violation of Section 220; (30) throwing acid or flammable substances, in violation
 of Section 244; (31) assault with a deadly weapon, firearm, machinegun, assault weapon, or semiautomatic firearm or assault on a peace officer or firefighter, in violation of Section 245; (32) assault with a deadly weapon against a public transit employee, custodial officer, or school employee, in violation of Section 245.2, 245.3, or 245.5; (33) discharge of a firearm at an inhabited dwelling, vehicle, or aircraft, in violation of Section 246; (34) commission of rape or sexual penetration in concert with another person, in violation of Section 264.1; (35) continuous sexual abuse of a child, in violation of Section 288.5; (36) shooting from a vehicle, in violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 26100; (37) intimidation of victims or witnesses, in violation of Section 136.1; (38) criminal threats, in violation of Section 422; (39) any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subdivision other than an assault; (40) any violation of Section 12022.53; (41) a violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section
 11418; (42) human trafficking of a minor, in violation of subdivision (c) of Section 236.1, except, with respect to a violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 236.1, where the person who committed the offense was a victim of human trafficking, as described in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 236.1, at the time of the offense; and (43) any conspiracy to commit an offense described in this subdivision.

(d) As used in this section, “bank robbery” means to take or attempt to take, by force or violence, or by intimidation from the person or presence of another any property or money or any other thing of value belonging to, or in the care, custody, control, management, or possession of, any bank, credit union, or any savings and loan
 association.

As used in this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Bank” means any member of the Federal Reserve System, and any bank, banking association, trust company, savings bank, or other banking institution organized or operating under the laws of the United States, and any bank the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(2) “Savings and loan association” means any federal savings and loan association and any “insured institution” as defined in Section 401 of the National Housing Act, as amended, and any federal credit union as defined in Section 2 of the Federal Credit Union Act.

(3) “Credit union” means any federal credit union and any state-chartered credit union the accounts of which are insured by
 the Administrator of the National Credit Union administration.

(e) The provisions of this section shall not be amended by the Legislature except by statute passed in each house by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, or by a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the electors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 230, Sec. 4.   (SB 14)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Note: This section was added on June 8, 1982, by initiative Prop. 8, and amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.8.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, “serious felony” also means any violation of Section 191.5, paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192, subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 192.5 of this code, or Section 2800.3, subdivision (b) of Section 23104, or Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code, when any of these offenses involve the personal infliction of great bodily injury on any person other than an accomplice, or the personal use of a dangerous or deadly weapon, within the meaning of paragraph (8) or (23) of subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting subdivision (a), to codify the court decisions of People v. Gonzales, 29 Cal. App. 4th 1684, and People v. Bow, 13 Cal. App. 4th 1551, and to clarify that the crimes specified in subdivision (a) have always been, and continue to be, serious felonies within the meaning of subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.

Judgment upon persons convicted of commission of crime shall be pronounced as follows:

(a) (1) If the conviction is for a felony, the defendant shall be personally present when judgment is pronounced against them, unless the defendant, in open court and on the
 record or in a notarized writing, requests that judgment be pronounced against them in their
 absence, and that
 they be represented by an attorney when judgment is pronounced, and the court approves the defendant’s absence during the pronouncement of judgment, or unless, after the exercise of reasonable diligence to procure the presence of the defendant, the court finds that it will be in the interest of justice that judgment be pronounced in the defendant’s absence.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), when any judgment imposing the death penalty has been affirmed by the appellate court, sentence may be reimposed upon the defendant in
 their absence by the court from which the appeal was taken in the following manner:

(A) Upon receipt by the superior court from which the appeal is taken of the certificate of the appellate court affirming the judgment, the judge of the superior court shall make and cause to be entered an order pronouncing sentence against the defendant, and a
 warrant signed by the judge, and attested by the clerk under the seal of the court, shall be drawn, and it shall state the conviction and judgment and appoint a day upon which the judgment shall be executed, which shall not be less than 60 days nor more than 90 days from the time of making the order.

(B) Within five days thereafter, a certified copy of the order, attested by the clerk under the seal of the court, and attached to the warrant, shall, for the purpose of execution, be transmitted by registered mail to the warden of the state prison having
 the custody of the defendant and certified copies thereof shall be transmitted electronically, in a mutually agreed upon format, to the Governor.

(C) When any judgment imposing the death penalty has been affirmed and sentence has been reimposed as
 provided in this paragraph there shall be no appeal from the order fixing the time for, and directing the execution of, the judgment.

(3) If a pro se defendant requests that judgment in a noncapital case be pronounced against them in their absence, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the defendant in the in absentia sentencing.

(b) If the conviction be of a misdemeanor, judgment may be pronounced against the defendant in their absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 3.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.

When the defendant is in custody, the Court may direct the officer in whose custody he is to bring him before it for judgment, and the officer must do so.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.

If the defendant has been released on bail, or has deposited money or property instead thereof, and does not appear for judgment when his personal appearance is necessary, the court, in addition to the forfeiture of the undertaking of bail, or of the money or property deposited, must, on application of the prosecuting attorney, direct the issuance of a bench warrant for the arrest of the defendant.

If the defendant, who is on bail, does appear for judgment and judgment is pronounced upon him or probation is granted to him, then the bail shall be exonerated or, if money or property has been deposited instead of bail, it must be returned to the defendant or to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited said money or property on behalf of said defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1187.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.

(a) The clerk must, at any time after the order, issue a bench warrant into one or more counties.

(b) The clerk shall require the appropriate agency to enter each bench warrant issued on a private surety-bonded felony case into the national warrant system (National Crime Information Center (NCIC)). If the appropriate agency fails to enter the bench warrant into the national warrant system (NCIC), and the court finds that this failure prevented the surety or bond agent from surrendering the fugitive into custody, prevented the fugitive from being arrested or taken into custody, or resulted in the fugitive’s subsequent release from custody, the court having jurisdiction over the bail shall, upon petition, set aside the forfeiture of the bond and declare all liability on the bail bond to be exonerated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.

The bench warrant must be substantially in the following form:

County of ____

The people of the State of California to any peace officer in this State: ______ (name of defendant) having been on the ____ day of ____, 19_, duly convicted in the ____ court of ____ (naming the court) of the crime of ____ (designating it generally), you are therefore commanded forthwith to arrest the above named defendant and bring him before that court for judgment.

Given under my hand with the seal of said court affixed, this ____ day of ____, 19_.

By order of said court. ____________________(seal)Clerk (or Judge, or Justice)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.

The bench warrant may be served in any county in the same manner as a warrant of arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1199.

Whether the bench warrant is served in the county in which it was issued or in another county, the officer must arrest the defendant and bring him before the court, or deliver him to any peace officer of the county from which the warrant issued, who must bring him before said court according to the command thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1200.

When the defendant appears for judgment he must be informed by the Court, or by the Clerk, under its direction, of the nature of the charge against him and of his plea, and the verdict, if any thereon, and must be asked whether he has any legal cause to show why judgment should not be pronounced against him.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

He or she may show, for cause against the judgment:

(a) That he or she is insane; and if, in the opinion of the court, there is reasonable ground for believing him or her insane, the question of insanity shall be tried as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2. If, upon the trial of that question, the jury finds that he or she is sane, judgment shall be pronounced, but if they find him or her insane, he or she shall be committed to the state hospital for the care and treatment of the insane, until he or she becomes sane; and when notice is given of that fact, as provided in Section 1372, he or she shall be brought before the court for judgment. 

(b) That he or she has good cause to offer, either in arrest of judgment or for a new trial; in which case the court may, in its discretion, order the judgment to be deferred, and proceed to decide upon the motion in arrest of judgment or for a new trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.3.

(a) Upon the conviction of a defendant for a sexual offense involving a minor victim or, in the case of a minor appearing in juvenile court, if a petition is admitted or sustained for a sexual offense involving a minor victim, the court is authorized to issue orders that would prohibit the defendant or juvenile, for a period up to 10 years, from harassing, intimidating, or threatening the victim or the victim’s family members or spouse.

(b) No order issued pursuant to this section shall be interpreted to apply to counsel acting on behalf of the defendant or juvenile, or to investigators working on behalf of counsel, in an action relating to a conviction, petition in juvenile court, or any civil action arising therefrom,
 provided, however, that no counsel or investigator shall harass or threaten any person protected by an order issued pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notice of the intent to request an order pursuant to this section shall be given to counsel for the defendant or juvenile by the prosecutor or the court at the time of conviction, or disposition of the petition in juvenile court, and counsel shall have adequate time in which to respond to the request before the order is made.

(d) A violation of an order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) is punishable as provided in Section 166.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 215.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.5.

Any motions made subsequent to judgment must be made only upon written notice served upon the prosecution at least three days prior to the date of hearing thereon. No affidavit or other writing shall be presented or considered in support thereof unless a copy of the same has been duly served upon the prosecution at least three days prior to a hearing thereon. Any appeal from an order entered upon a motion made other than as herein provided, must be dismissed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

If no sufficient cause is alleged or appears to the court at the time fixed for pronouncing judgment, as provided in Section 1191, why judgment should not be pronounced, it shall thereupon be rendered; and if not rendered or pronounced within the time so fixed or to which it is continued under the provisions of Section 1191, then the defendant shall be entitled to a new trial. If the court shall refuse to hear a defendant’s motion for a new trial or when made shall neglect to determine such motion before pronouncing judgment or the making of an order granting probation, then the defendant shall be entitled to a new trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

1202a.

If the judgment is for imprisonment in the state prison the judgment shall direct that the defendant be delivered into the custody of the Director of Corrections at the state prison or institution designated by the Director of Corrections as the place for the reception of persons convicted of felonies, except where the judgment is for death in which case the defendant shall be taken to the warden of the California State Prison at San Quentin.

Unless a different place or places are so designated by the Director of Corrections, the judgment shall direct that the defendant be delivered into the custody of the Director of Corrections at the California State Prison at San Quentin. The Director of Corrections shall designate a place or places for the reception of persons convicted of felonies by order, which order or orders shall be served by registered mail, return receipt requested, upon each judge of each superior court in the state. The Director of Corrections may change the place or places of commitment by the issuance of a new order. Nothing contained in this section affects any provision of Section 3400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.05.

(a) Whenever a person is sentenced to the state prison on or after January 1, 1993, for violating Section 261, 264.1, 266c, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 288a, and the victim of one or more of those offenses is a child under the age of 18 years, the court shall prohibit all visitation between the defendant and the child victim. The court’s order shall be transmitted to the Department of Corrections, to the parents, adoptive parents, or guardians, or a combination thereof, of the child victim, and to the child victim. If any parent, adoptive parent, or legal guardian of the child victim, or
 the child victim objects to the court’s order, he or she may request a hearing on the matter. Any request for a hearing on the matter filed with the sentencing court shall be referred to the appropriate juvenile court pursuant to Section 362.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The Department of Corrections is authorized to notify the sentencing court of persons who were sentenced to the state prison prior to January 1, 1993, for violating Section 261, 264.1, 266c, 285, 286, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 288a, when the victim of one or more of those offenses was a child under the age of 18 years.

Upon notification by the department pursuant to this subdivision, the sentencing court shall prohibit all visitation between the defendant and the child victim, according to the procedures specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 88.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 120975 and 120990 of the Health and Safety Code, the court shall order every person who is convicted of, or adjudged by the court to be a person described by Section 601 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code as provided in Section 725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code by reason of a violation of, a sexual offense listed in subdivision (e), whether or not a sentence or fine is imposed or probation is granted, to submit to a blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva test for evidence of antibodies to the probable causative agent of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) within 180 days of the date of conviction. Each person tested under this section shall be informed of the results of the blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva test.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code, the results of the blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva test to detect antibodies to the probable causative agent of AIDS shall be transmitted by the clerk of the court to the Department of Justice and the local health officer.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code, the Department of Justice shall provide the results of a test or tests as to persons under investigation or being prosecuted under Section 12022.85, if the results are on file with the department, to the defense attorney upon request and the results also shall be available to the prosecuting attorney upon request for the purpose of either preparing counts for a sentence enhancement under Section 12022.85 or complying with subdivision (d).

(d) (1) When a person is convicted of a sexual
 offense listed in subdivision (e) or adjudged by the court to be a person described by Section 601 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code as provided in Section 725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code by reason of the commission of a sexual offense listed in subdivision (e), the prosecutor or the prosecutor’s victim-witness assistance bureau shall advise the victim of the right to receive the results of the blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva test performed pursuant to subdivision (a). The prosecutor or the prosecutor’s victim-witness assistance bureau shall refer the victim to the local health officer for counseling to assist the victim in understanding the extent to which the particular circumstances of the crime may or may not have placed the victim at risk of transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) from the accused, to ensure that the victim understands the limitations and benefits of current tests for HIV, and to assist the victim in determining whether the victim should make
 the request.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, upon the victim’s request, the local health officer shall be responsible for disclosing test results to the victim who requested the test and the person who was tested. However, as specified in subdivision (g), positive test results shall not be disclosed to the victim or the person who was tested without offering or providing professional counseling appropriate to the circumstances as follows:

(A) To help the victim understand the extent to which the particular circumstances of the crime may or may not have put the victim at risk of transmission of HIV from the perpetrator.

(B) To ensure that the victim understands both the benefits and limitations of the current tests for HIV.

(C) To obtain referrals to
 appropriate health care and support services.

(e) For purposes of this section, “sexual offense” includes any of the following:

(1) Rape in violation of Section 261, 261.4, or former Section 262.

(2) Unlawful intercourse with a person under 18 years of age in violation of Section 261.5 or 266c.

(3) Sodomy in violation of Section 266c or 286.

(4) Oral copulation in violation of Section 266c or 287, or former Section 288a.

(5) (A) Any of the following offenses if the court finds that there is probable cause to believe that blood, semen, or any other bodily fluid capable of transmitting HIV has been
 transferred from the defendant to the victim:

(i) Sexual penetration in violation of Section 264.1, 266c, or 289.

(ii) Aggravated sexual assault of a child in violation of Section 269.

(iii) Lewd or lascivious conduct with a child in violation of Section 288.

(iv) Continuous sexual abuse of a child in violation of Section 288.5.

(v) The attempt to commit any offense described in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the court shall note its finding on the court docket and minute order if one is prepared.

(f) Any blood or oral
 mucosal transudate saliva tested pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subjected to appropriate confirmatory tests to ensure accuracy of the first test results, and under no circumstances shall test results be transmitted to the victim or the person who is tested unless any initially reactive test result has been confirmed by appropriate confirmatory tests for positive reactors.

(g) The local health officer shall be responsible for disclosing test results to the victim who requested the test and the person who was tested. However, positive test results shall not be disclosed to the victim or the person who was tested without offering or providing professional counseling appropriate to the circumstances.

(h) The local health officer and the victim shall comply with all laws and policies relating to medical confidentiality, subject to the disclosure authorized by subdivisions (g) and
 (i).

(i) A victim who receives information from the local health officer pursuant to subdivision (g) may disclose the information as the victim deems necessary to protect the victim’s health and safety or the health and safety of the victim’s family or sexual partner.

(j) A person who transmits test results or discloses information pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any action taken in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 44.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.4.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that a victim of a crime who incurs an economic loss as a result of the commission of a crime shall receive restitution directly from a defendant convicted of that crime.

(2) Upon a person being convicted of a crime in the State of California, the court shall order the defendant to pay a fine in the form of a penalty assessment in accordance with Section 1464.

(3) The court, in addition to any other penalty provided or imposed under the law, shall order the defendant
 to pay both of the following:

(A) A restitution fine in accordance with subdivision (b).

(B) Restitution to the victim or victims, if any, in accordance with subdivision (f), which shall be enforceable as if the order were a civil judgment and shall be paid as specified in subdivision (i).

(b) In every case where a person is convicted of a crime, the court shall impose a separate and additional restitution fine, unless it finds compelling and extraordinary reasons for not doing so and states those reasons on the record.

(1) The restitution fine shall be set at the discretion of the court and commensurate with the seriousness of the offense. If the person is
 convicted of a felony, the fine shall not be less than three hundred dollars ($300) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). If the person is convicted of a misdemeanor, the fine shall not be less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) In setting a felony restitution fine, the court may determine the amount of the fine as the product of the minimum fine pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the number of years of imprisonment the defendant is ordered to serve, multiplied by the number of felony counts of which the defendant is convicted.

(c) The court shall impose the restitution fine unless it finds compelling and extraordinary reasons for not doing so and states those reasons on the record. A defendant’s inability to pay
 shall not be considered a compelling and extraordinary reason not to impose a restitution fine. Inability to pay may be considered only in increasing the amount of the restitution fine in excess of the minimum fine pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). The court may specify that funds confiscated at the time of the defendant’s arrest, except for funds confiscated pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 11469) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, be applied to the restitution fine if the funds are not exempt for spousal or child support or subject to any other legal exemption.

(d) In setting the amount of the fine pursuant to subdivision (b) in excess of the minimum fine pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the court shall consider any relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the defendant’s
 inability to pay, the seriousness and gravity of the offense and the circumstances of its commission, any economic gain derived by the defendant as a result of the crime, the extent to which any other person suffered losses as a result of the crime, and the number of victims involved in the crime. Those losses may include pecuniary losses to the victim or the victim’s dependents as well as intangible losses, such as psychological harm caused by the crime. Consideration of a defendant’s inability to pay may include the defendant’s future earning capacity. A defendant shall bear the burden of demonstrating the defendant’s inability to pay. Express findings by the court as to the factors bearing on the amount of the fine shall not be required. A separate hearing for the fine shall not be required.

(e) The restitution fine shall not be subject
 to penalty assessments authorized in Section 1464 or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code, or the state surcharge authorized in Section 1465.7, and shall be deposited in the Restitution Fund in the State Treasury.
